Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1608
Trustees; bond; amount; conditions; premium; suit on bond.

Each trustee of any such district shall, prior to entering upon his office, execute and file with the county clerk of the county in which said district, or the greater portion of the area thereof, is located, his bond with one or more sureties, to be approved by the county clerk, running to the district in the penal sum of five thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance by said trustee of his official duties and the faithful accounting by him for all funds and property of the district that shall come into his possession or control during his term of office. The premium, if any, on any such bond shall be paid out of the funds of the district. Suit may be brought on such bonds by any person, firm, or corporation that has sustained loss or damage in consequence of the breach thereof.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 8, p. 528.